Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1309
Resisting arrest; disobeying order; violation; penalty.

Any person who fails or refuses to obey any lawful order of a carrier enforcement officer or who resists lawful arrest by any such officer shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1955, c. 145, § 9, p. 408;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 92;

Laws 1985, LB 395, § 10.